Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 5 Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement
Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 198, § 2, provided: “The increase in benefits as provided in Section 1 of this act shall not be added to the base annuity for the purpose of computing the annual post-retirement increase as provided in Ark. Code Ann. § 24-5-119(a) for the benefit redetermination July 1, 1991, or for any years thereafter.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 930, § 4, provided: “All laws or parts of laws in conflict with this act are hereby repealed, provided, none of the amendments contained in this Act are intended to nor shall they be construed to amend or affect any of the state-supported retirement system laws of this State, with the exception of the laws pertaining to the Arkansas State Highway Employees.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1967, No. 254, § 4: Mar. 10, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a number of employees of the State Highway Department have not obtained prior service, or current service credit under the State Highway Employees Retirement System, and that other employees who have obtained previous service in other State agencies are unable under existing laws to obtain prior service credit for such previous service and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to permit such employees to make application for and obtain credit for such service under the State Highway Employees Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 167, § 12: July 1, 1969.

Acts 1971, No. 246, § 4: Mar. 9, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the providing of reasonable and adequate retirement benefits for employees of the Highway Department and their beneficiaries is necessary to provide the Highway Department Employees with more flexibility in providing for their retirement and for their dependents; and that immediate passage of the Act is necessary to make available to the members of the State Highway Employees Retirement System dependents' benefits as are now available to employees of other State Agencies; therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 458, § 3: Mar. 30, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain career employees of the State Highway Department who were retired and drawing benefits under the system have died since July 1, 1969, leaving surviving spouses for which no survivor benefits are provided in the State Highway Employees Retirement System law; that legislation is presently pending to provide optional survivor benefits for survivors of deceased members of the system and that provisions should be made for survivor benefits for the surviving spouses of the members of the system who have died after retirement and subsequent to July 1, 1969 and that this act is immediately necessary to provide such benefits. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 185, § 3: Feb. 26, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain career employees of the State Highway Department who were retired and drawing benefits under the system have died since July 1, 1969, leaving surviving spouses for which no survivor benefits are provided in the State Highway Employees Retirement System law; that provisions should be made for survivor benefits for the surviving spouses of the members of the system who have died after retirement and subsequent to July 1, 1969, and that this Act is immediately necessary to provide such benefits. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 599, § 7: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act change the rate of contributions, and option provisions under the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System; and, in order to enable persons to receive proper benefits thereunder without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1977, No. 722, § 6: Mar. 20, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act make the changes necessary to provide for the unfunded liabilities of the System by a change in the rate of Employer contributions to the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System, and therefore the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after March 20, 1977.”

Acts 1979, No. 126, § 4: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly, that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1979 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1979, No. 821, § 6: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act change the rate of contributions, and benefits under the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System; and, in order to enable persons to receive proper benefits thereunder without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 295, § 14: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that essential provisions of the System's retirement statutes are hereby changed, and in order that the members of the System may receive proper benefits thereunder, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1983, No. 464, § 4: Mar. 15, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “The benefits of a Straight Life annuity should be made available to the retirants who chose Option B and whose beneficiaries have pre-deceased them and it is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 479, § 4: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System should provide an increase in annuities for those members and beneficiaries who retired before July 1, 1982. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 106, § 3: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “The benefits of Option C should be made available to the retirants who retired before options were available and it is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1985, No. 379, § 4: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System law needs to be amended to allow retirement with thirty (30) years creditable service without penalty to otherwise eligible employees. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985”

Acts 1985, No. 611, § 4: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System should provide an increase in annuities for those members and beneficiaries who retired before July 1, 1984. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1987, No. 119, § 3: Mar. 4, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “The appointment of a beneficiary and changing of options should be made available to the retirants as expeditiously as possible and it is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 187, § 11: Mar. 12, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a reduction in work force caused by budgetary constraints may be avoided by offering early retirement incentives; that to offer early retirement incentives and to avoid unnecessary layoffs this Act should take effect immediately upon its passage. Therefore, an emergency is declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 213, § 7: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1987 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1987 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1987, No. 315, § 3: Mar. 19, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “The appointment of a beneficiary and changing of options should be made available to the retirants as expeditiously as possible and it is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish the same. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 455, § 4: Mar. 30, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “There are some military veterans that have been excluded by prior laws and have been unable to purchase service credit in the Highway Employees Retirement System for their military time. To correct this oversight, and to enable the members to purchase some service credit in the system for the time spent in service of their country, it is hereby determined that an emergency exists, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, welfare, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 41, § 5: Feb. 7, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some confusion has arisen concerning the calculation of retirement benefits for members of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System following two legislative increases which were not codified from the statute to the Arkansas Code in 1987; that in order to clarify that such enactments did result in an increase in the multiplier and avoid further confusion, the immediate passage of this act is necessary. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 243, § 5: Feb. 27, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System law needs to be amended to allow members to accrue more than thirty-five (35) years of creditable service. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 245, § 7: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided under the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 246, § 5: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that benefits provided under the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 380, § 7: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System, the Arkansas State Police Retirement System and the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship to many such retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 359, § 5: Mar. 3, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the service rendered on the Arkansas Highway Commission by many people has not been adequately rewarded for many years, that to not reward theses services with vesting will create an inequity for all eligible employees, and that the effective and efficient administration of the state government demands that this inequity be corrected immediately. Therefore, in order to correct this inequity, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 929, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship to many such retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1993, No. 930, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that the amendments contained in this Act are necessary in order for the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department to continue to retain and recruit efficient and skilled employees and by immediately decreasing the number of months from sixty to forty-eight for the purposes of ascertaining “average compensation” for retirement benefit purposes will greatly assist such retention and recruitment efforts. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 407, § 5: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the retirement benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate and that the benefits should be increased as soon as practicable without delay in order to avoid an undue hardship to many retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, in order to avoid any undue hardship on retirants, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 347, § 10: Mar. 5, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current trend in employment for workers in the United States is for employees to work for shorter periods of time and to work for more than one employer during their working years; that the trend for retirement systems in the United States is to require shorter vesting periods for employees in order to adjust to this reality in U. S. employment patterns; that the current Highway Employees' Retirement System law requires a ten-year vesting period; and that it is critically necessary for the Highway Employees' Retirement System law to be amended to meet these changing patterns in employee benefits within the United States as soon as possible and this act should have immediate effect. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 349, § 6: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly that the amendments contained in this Act are necessary in order for the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department to continue to retain and recruit efficient and skilled employees; that immediately decreasing the number of months from forty-eight to thirty-six for the purposes of ascertaining “average compensation” for retirement benefit purposes will greatly assist such retention and recruitment efforts; that benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate; and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship to many such retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 386, § 6: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided under the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship; in order for the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department to continue to retain and recruit efficient and skilled employees and by immediately increasing the multiplier amount for retirement benefit purposes will greatly assist such retention and recruitment efforts; and that benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship to many such retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 955, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current law requires State Highway Department employees to be members of the Highway Employees' Retirement System even if they are retired from another state-supported retirement system; that this violates a longstanding policy of prohibiting persons from earning service credit in two (2) state-supported retirement systems; and the law should be changed to limit the eligibility for double service credit to only those Highway employees' currently eligible and required to be members. Therefore, in order to restore a longstanding policy principle, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 28: July 1, 1998.

Acts 1997, No. 1067, § 6: Apr. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas Code 24-5-118 contains language describing a retirement option that is no longer available and does not set forth the spouse's benefits upon the death of the retirant. Therefore, in order to more effectively administer retirement funds an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1089, § 6: Apr. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the State Highway Employees' Retirement System was created to benefit the employees of the Arkansas Highway Department; that, in the event of a member's death, the financial interests of the member's spouse and his or her dependents are often adversely affected and left in crisis; and it is immediately necessary to fill in this financial gap in the best interest of the member-employees and the State. Therefore, in the best interest of the State, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved or vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 32, § 5: Feb. 8, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that unless the accounting needs of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are immediately automated, delays could occur in preparing accurate financial statements and delays could occur in the recording of investment transactions, which statements and recordings are required to be maintained by State and federal laws and regulations; that such delays could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration of essential governmental programs; and in order to avoid these delays, this act should take effect immediately upon its passage and approval. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 311, § 6: Feb. 25, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that, due to the ever escalating costs of health insurance and health care, benefits provided under the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 335, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided under the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1066, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that benefit provisions applicable to local officers and employees need revision, and that the effective administration of this act makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1325, § 14: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 311 of 1999 changes the amount of additional monthly benefits in the State Highway Employees' Retirement System and they are necessary for the continued financial stability of the current retirees, that clarifications are needed in order to make Act 311 take effect in an orderly fashion, that these changes in Act 311 must then take effect at the same time Act 311 becomes effective, and that it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act, except for Sections 2 and 3, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 19: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that this act makes various technical corrections in the Arkansas Code; that this act further clarifies the law to provide that the Arkansas Code Revision Commission may correct errors resulting from enactments of prior sessions; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to be applicable during the codification process of the enactments of this regular session. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 482, § 3: Mar. 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that deceased retirees of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System leave beneficiaries in need of financial support, that there is a necessity of financial stability for beneficiaries during this time of crisis, that this benefit is then important to provide for retirees immediately, and that this act should therefore have immediate effect. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 539, § 4: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided under the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate and an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship that, in order for the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department to continue to retain and recruit efficient and skilled employees, the system must immediately increase the multiplier amount for retirement benefit purposes, and that benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship to the retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2003, No. 205, § 2: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that annuity provisions of the State Highway Employees' Retirement System need revisions to make them more actuarially accurate for present and future retirees in order to not endanger the financial status of the system; that implementation of these revised actuarial adjustments need to be implemented at a precise time and before the normal time for the effectiveness of other laws; and that they need to be effective at the beginning of the fiscal year for state government. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2005, No. 144, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that due to the ever escalating costs of health insurance and health care, benefits provided under the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2009, No. 439, § 2: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this language more equably allocates the health care offset benefits provided under the Arkansas State Highway Employees’ Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 564, § 6: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System law are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that a member's purchase of service credit currently provides that a member pay the system yesterday's dollars for the value of today's benefits; that such a valuation is unfair to the members as a whole and inconsistent with the prudent management of the system's funds and obligations; that the purchase of service credit in the system should be based upon actuarial equivalents; that the purchase of service credit should be paid in a lump sum to the system unless otherwise authorized; that current service purchase accounts remain unpaid and inactive for many years at a time and create an administrative burden and accounting difficulty on the system that can be remedied by the passage of this act; and that this act is necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2013, No. 73, § 3: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System law are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is necessary to maintain a professional Board of Trustees for the members of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2013, No. 309, § 4: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System law needs to be amended to provide a more equitable means of allocating the additional benefit that offsets the cost of health insurance and health care. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2)
If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3)
If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

Acts 2013, No. 310, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System law are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”
